Tennessee, session 114, HB1731.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-311, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection:
(c) As used in this section, "desecrate" includes, but is not limited to, the removal
of objects from a place of burial by a person other than a family member of the deceased
or an authorized representative of the cemetery.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1731
009748
- 1 -